Maryland, session 2026, HB1380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–864.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1380*

HOUSE BILL 1380
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION” MEANS A
PRESCRIPTION FOR A PRESCRIPTION DRUG:
(I) USED TO MEDICALLY SUPPRESS, INCREASE, OR REPLACE
HORMONES THAT THE BODY IS NOT PRODUCING AT INTENDED LEVELS; OR
(II) RELATED TO GENDER–AFFIRMING TREATMENT, AS
DEFINED IN § 15–151 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE, THAT IS LAWFUL IN THE
STATE.
(2) “QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
PRESCRIPTION FOR:
(I) A GLUCAGON–LIKE PEPTIDE–1 OR GLUCAGON–LIKE
PEPTIDE–1 RECEPTOR ANTAGONIST;
(II) A PRESCRIPTION DRUG THAT CANNOT BE SAFELY STORED
AT ROOM TEMPERATURE WITHOUT REFRIGERATION; OR
(III) A PRESCRIPTION PRESCRIBED FOR SINGLE USE,
EMERGENCY USE, OR FOR A NONRENEWABLE COURSE OF TREATMENT THAT THE
PRESCRIBER DOES NOT INTEND TO CONTINUE ON AN ONGOING OR MAINTENANCE
BASIS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTIONS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE
POLICIES AND CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTIONS FOR QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTIONS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (D) AND (E) OF THIS SECTION, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR A SINGLE DISPENSING
TO AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE OF A SUPPLY OF A QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION FOR
UP TO A 12–MONTH PERIOD.
(D) FOR A QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION THAT IS FOR A CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCE, AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
THE MAXIMUM SUPPLY THAT MAY BE DISPENSED AT ONE TIME UNDER FEDERAL AND
STATE LAW.

HOUSE BILL 1380 3
(E) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY:
(1) TEMPORARILY LIMIT DISPENSING OF A QUALIFYING
PRESCRIPTION TO A 90–DAY SUPPLY IF THE QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION IS FOR A
DRUG EXPERIENCING AN ACUTE DISPENSING SHORTAGE;
(2) LIMIT THE DISPENSING OF A QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION
OBTAINED DURING THE LAST QUARTER OF A PLAN YEAR IF A 12–MONTH SUPPLY OF
THE SAME QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION WAS ALREADY DISPENSED DURING THE PLAN
YEAR; AND
(3) TO THE EXTENT AUTHORIZED UNDER FEDERAL AND STATE LAW,
APPLY UTILIZATION MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES TO A QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION.
(F) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT REQUIRE AN ENROLLEE
TO ACCEPT A 12–MONTH SUPPLY OF A QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION IF:
(1) THE ENROLLEE REQUESTS A SMALLER SUPPLY OF THE
QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION; OR
(2) THE PRESCRIBING PROVIDER INDICATES THAT THE ENROLLEE
SHOULD RECEIVE A SMALLER SUPPLY OF THE QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION.
Article – Health Occupations
12–512.
(a) (1) In this section[, “authorized prescriber”] THE FOLLOWING WORDS
HAVE THE MEANINGS INDICATED.
(2) “AUTHORIZED PRESCRIBER” has the meaning stated in § 12–101 of
this title.
(3) “QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
15–864 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
(b) This section does not apply to:
(1) A controlled dangerous substance as defined in § 5–101 of the Criminal
Law Article; or
(2) The first prescription or change in a prescription for a drug that an
authorized prescriber prescribes for a patient.

HOUSE BILL 1380
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a pharmacist may
dispense, in a single dispensing and exercising the professional judgment of the
pharmacist, a quantity of a prescription drug that:
(1) Is up to the total number of dosage units authorized by the prescriber
on the original prescription and any refills of the prescription;
(2) Except for a contraceptive dispensed on or after January 1, 2020, OR A
QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION DISPENSED AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, does not exceed a
90–day supply of the prescription drug; [and]
(3) For a contraceptive dispensed on or after January 1, 2020, does not
exceed a 12–month supply of the prescription drug; AND
(4) FOR A QUALIFYING PRESCRIPTION DISPENSED AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, DOES NOT EXCEED A 12–MONTH SUPPLY OF THE PRESCRIPTION DRUG.
(d) A pharmacist may not dispense, in a single dose, a quantity of a prescription
drug that exceeds the limit prescribed by a prescriber when the prescriber has indicated
that the prescription be dispensed only as prescribed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.